Utah statutes.
67-5b-105.   Local advisory boards -- Membership.

(1)  The cooperating public agencies and other persons shall make up each center's local advisory board, which shall be composed of the following people from the county or area:

(a)  the local center director or the director's designee;

(b)  a district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction or any designee;

(c)  a representative of the attorney general's office, designated by the attorney general;

(d)  a county sheriff or a chief of police or their designee;

(e)  the county executive or the county executive's designee;

(f)  a licensed nurse practitioner or physician;

(g)  a licensed mental health professional;

(h)  a criminal defense attorney;

(i)  at least four members of the community at large provided, however, that the state advisory board may authorize fewer members, although not less than two, if the local advisory board so requests;

(j)  a guardian ad litem or representative of the Office of Guardian Ad Litem, designated by the director; and

(k)  a representative of the Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human Services, designated by the employee of the division who has supervisory responsibility for the county served by the center.

(2)  The members on each local advisory board who serve due to public office as provided in Subsections (1)(b) through (e) shall select the remaining members.  The members on each local advisory board shall select a chair of the local advisory board.

(3)  The local advisory board may not supersede the authority of the contracting public agency as designated in Section 67-5b-104.

(4)  Appointees and designees shall serve a term or terms as designated in the bylaws of the local advisory board.



Amended by Chapter 129, 2011 General Session

